Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 8. Transitional Provisions.

§79-10-111.
Application to existing corporations.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, this chapter applies to professional corporations in existence on July 1, 1995. A professional corporation in existence on July 1, 1995, may, but is not required to, amend its articles of incorporation to comply with this chapter. If a professional corporation in existence on July 1, 1995, amends its articles of incorporation for any purpose after July 1, 1995, it must also amend its articles of incorporation to comply with this chapter.

This chapter does not apply to a corporation now existing or later incorporated under a law of this state that is not a professional corporation unless the corporation elects professional corporation status under Section 79-10-11.

This chapter does not affect an existing or future right or privilege to render professional services through the use of any other form of business entity.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by an amendment to the articles of incorporation, for professional corporations in existence on July 1, 1995, Sections 79-10-39, 79-10-41 and 79-10-43 shall be applied by substituting the term “book value” for the term “fair value” in such sections only. Book value shall be determined from the books and records of the professional corporation in accordance with the regular method of accounting used by the professional corporation and shall be determined as of the end of the month immediately preceding the death or disqualification of the shareholder.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 84-99.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 179.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 139, 140 et seq.

§79-10-113.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The Mississippi Legislature has power to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time and all domestic and foreign professional corporations subject to this chapter are governed by the amendment or repeal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§79-10-115.
Saving provisions.

Except as provided in subsection (2), the repeal of a statute by this chapter does not affect:

The operation of the statute or any action taken under it before its repeal;

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation or liability acquired, accrued or incurred under the statute before its repeal;

Any violation of the statute, or any penalty, forfeiture or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal;

Any proceeding, reorganization or dissolution commenced under the statute before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed.

If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a statute repealed by this chapter is reduced by this chapter, the penalty or punishment if not already imposed shall be imposed in accordance with this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§79-10-117.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1995.